Hawaii statutes.
§412:10-121 Central credit unions. (a)
Central credit unions may be chartered under this article and shall enjoy all
powers of other credit unions chartered under this article and be subject to
all provisions of this article not inconsistent with this section.

(b) A central credit union is a credit union
whose field of membership includes the following:

(1) Officers, directors, committee members and
employees of credit unions organized under this article or any other credit
union law;

(2) Officers, directors and employees of associations
of credit unions;

(3) Employees of federal or state government agencies
responsible for the supervision of credit unions in this State;

(4) Persons in the field of membership of liquidated
credit unions or of credit unions which have entered into or will enter into
voluntary or involuntary liquidation proceedings;

(5) Employees of an employer having an insufficient
number of employees to form or conduct the affairs of a separate credit union;
and

(6) Members of the immediate families of persons
qualifying for membership under this subsection. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next